test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-ngano_gt-norm.yaml
     ӈано+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg: ӈанов 
     ӈано+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg: ӈанор  
     ӈано+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg: ӈанода 
     ӈано+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg: ӈаномиʼ
     ӈано+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg: ӈанориʼ
     ӈано+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg: ӈанодиʼ
     ӈано+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg: ӈановаˮ
     ӈано+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg: ӈанораˮ
     ӈано+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg: ӈанодоʼ
     ӈано+N+Du+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu: ӈанохоюн  
     ӈано+N+Du+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu: ӈанохоюд  
     ӈано+N+Du+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu: ӈанохоюда 
     ӈано+N+Du+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu: ӈанохоюниʼ
     ӈано+N+Du+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu: ӈанохоюдиʼ
     ӈано+N+Du+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu: ӈанохоюдиʼ
     ӈано+N+Du+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu: ӈанохоюнаˮ
     ӈано+N+Du+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu: ӈанохоюдаˮ
     ӈано+N+Du+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu: ӈанохоюдоʼ
     ӈано+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl: ӈанун   
     ӈано+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl: ӈануд   
     ӈано+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl: ӈануда  
     ӈано+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl: ӈануниʼ 
     ӈано+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl: ӈанудиʼ 
     ӈано+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl: ӈанудиʼ 
     ӈано+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl: ӈанунаˮ 
     ӈано+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl: ӈанудаˮ 
     ӈано+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl: ӈанудоʼ 
     ӈано+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg: ӈановась
     ӈано+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg: ӈанорась
     ӈано+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg: ӈанодась
     ӈано+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg: ӈаноминзь
     ӈано+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg: ӈаноринзь
     ӈано+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg: ӈанодинзь
     ӈано+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg: ӈановаць
     ӈано+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg: ӈанораць
     ӈано+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg: ӈанодонзь
     ӈано+N+Du+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu: ӈанохоюнась
     ӈано+N+Du+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu: ӈанохоюдась
     ӈано+N+Du+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu: ӈанохоюдась
     ӈано+N+Du+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu: ӈанохоюнинзь
     ӈано+N+Du+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu: ӈанохоюдинзь
     ӈано+N+Du+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu: ӈанохоюдинзь
     ӈано+N+Du+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu: ӈанохоюнаць
     ӈано+N+Du+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu: ӈанохоюдаць
     ӈано+N+Du+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu: ӈанохоюдонзь
     ӈано+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl: ӈанунась
     ӈано+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl: ӈанудась
     ӈано+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl: ӈанудась
     ӈано+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl: ӈанунинзь
     ӈано+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl: ӈанудинзь
     ӈано+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl: ӈанудинзь
     ӈано+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl: ӈанунаць
     ӈано+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl: ӈанудаць
     ӈано+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl: ӈанудонзь
